src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_CONTR_O !båtsoj<->buhtsu, suolo<->sullu (except NOM.SG)
+N+Sg+Acc:u%>v K ;
+N+Sg+Gen:u%> K ;
+N+Sg+Ill:u%>j K ;
+N+Sg+Ine:u%>n K ;
+N+Sg+Ela:u%>st K ;
+N+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:u%>s K ;
+N+Sg+Com:u%>jn K ;
+N+Ess:u%>n K ;
+N+Ess:u%>n K ;
+N+Abe:u%>dak K ; ! XXX
+N+Pl+Nom:u%> K ;
+N+Pl+Acc:u%>jt K ;
+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:u%>jd K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:u%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Ill:u%>jda K ;
+N+Pl+Ine:u%>jn K ;
+N+Pl+Ela:u%>jst K ;
+N+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:u%>js K ;
+N+Pl+Com:u%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:u%>jgum K ;
+N: N_CONTR_O_DIM ; !buhtsutj

LEXICON N_CONTR_AJA !ålmáj<->ålmá
+N+Sg+Nom:á^WGj%> K ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom:á^WGj%> R ; !compound element in weak-grade with final-C
+N+Cmp/SgGen:á%> R ; !compound element in strong-grade with not final-C; cf. ålbmábarrgo
+N+Sg+Acc:á%>v K ;
+N+Sg+Gen:á%> K ;
+N+Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;
+N+Sg+Ine:á%>n K ;
+N+Sg+Ela:á%>st K ;
+N+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:á%>s K ;
+N+Sg+Com:á%>jn K ;
+N+Ess:á%>n K ; !check ^WG - is it required by ESS? is it implemented by twolc?
!+N+Ess:á^WGn K ; !check ^WG - is it required by ESS? is it implemented by twolc?
+N+Abe:á%>dak K ; ! XXX
+N+Pl+Nom:á%> K ;
+N+Pl+Acc:á%>jt K ;
+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:á%>jd K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:á%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Ill:á%>jda K ;
+N+Pl+Ine:á%>jn K ;
+N+Pl+Ela:á%>jst K ;
+N+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:á%>js K ;
+N+Pl+Com:á%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:á%>jgum K ;
+N: N_CONTR_DIM ; !ålmátj


LEXICON N_CONTR_ESAA !sarves<->sarvvá
+N+Sg+Nom:e^WGs%> K ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom:e^WGs%> R ; !compound element in weak-grade with final-C
+N+Cmp/SgGen:á%> R ; !compound element in weak-grade with final-C ; not sure! cf. fállábärrgo
+N+Sg+Acc:á%>v K ;
+N+Sg+Gen:á%> K ;
+N+Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;
+N+Sg+Ine:á%>n K ;
+N+Sg+Ela:á%>st K ;
+N+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:á%>s K ;
+N+Sg+Com:á%>jn K ;
+N+Ess:á%>n K ; !check ^WG - is it required by ESS? is it implemented by twolc?
!+N+Ess:á^WGn K ; !check ^WG - is it required by ESS? is it implemented by twolc?
+N+Abe:á%>dak K ; ! XXX
+N+Pl+Nom:á%> K ;
+N+Pl+Acc:á%>jt K ;
+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:á%>jd K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:á%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Ill:á%>jda K ;
+N+Pl+Ine:á%>jn K ;
+N+Pl+Ela:á%>jst K ;
+N+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:á%>js K ;
+N+Pl+Com:á%>j K ;
+N+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:á%>jgum K ;
+N: N_CONTR_DIM ; !sarrvátj


LEXICON N_CONTR_O_DIM ! buhtsutj
+Der/Dimin+N:u%>tj N_DIM_s2 ;

LEXICON N_CONTR_DIM ! ålmátj, sarrvátj
+Der/Dimin+N:á%>tj N_DIM_s2 ;



!general addition of DIM case/number endings (avoids recursive DIM generation)
LEXICON N_DIM_s2 !nom.sg, then link to other forms
!+Sg+Nom: K ;
!: N_ODD_X ;
: NO_VH_X ;

LEXICON PX ! possessive suffixes (not clearly productive; initial SgNom set from Lehtiranta 1992)
+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:m # ; !cf. Lagercrantz 1957 text 426
+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:t # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:s # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxDu1:ma # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxDu2:da # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxDu3:sa # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxPl1:men # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:den # ; 
+Sg+Nom+PxPl3:ska # ; 






! NOTE: 
! NOTE: below here: lexica that are referred to in adjectives (or at least outside noun-stems)
! NOTE: 

!used by adjectives - don't delete yet:
!LEXICON EVENCASE_4 !used by adjectives - don't delete yet:
!+Sg+Nom:^CDEL K ;
!:a N_EVEN_ESS ; !essive

!used by adjectives - don't delete yet:
LEXICON N_EVEN_C !used by adjectives - don't delete yet:
+Sg+Gen:%>o  K ; 
+Sg+Acc:%>ov  K ;
+Sg+Ine:%>on K ;
+Sg+Ela:%>ost K ;
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:%>os K ;
+Abe:%>odak K ; ! Norm
+Pl+Nom:%>o  K ;
+Sg+Com:%>ojn   K ; !norm
+Sg+Com+Use/NG:%>ojna  K ; !variant
+Pl+Gen:%>oj    K ;
+Pl+Acc:%>ojt   K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:%>ojd   K ;
+Pl+Ine:%>ojn   K ;
+Pl+Ela:%>ojst  K ; !norm
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:%>ojs  K ;
+Pl+Ill:%>ojda  K ; 
+Pl+Com:%>oj    K ;
+Ess:%>on K ;

!used by adjectives - don't delete yet:
LEXICON ODD_OBLIQUE_COMMON !used by adjectives - don't delete yet:
+Sg+Acc:a%>v K ;
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
+Sg+Ine:i%>n K ;
+Sg+Ela:i%>st K ; 
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:i%>s K ; 
+Sg+Com:i%>jn K ;
+Ess:i%>n K ;
+Pl+Nom:a K ;
+Pl+Acc:i%>jt K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:i%>jd K ;
+Pl+Gen:i%>j K ;
+Pl+Ill:i%>jda K ;
+Pl+Ine:i%>jn K ;
+Pl+Ela:i%>jst K ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:i%>js K ;
+Pl+Com:i%>j K ;

!used by adjectives - don't delete yet:
LEXICON ODD_OBLIQUE_U_COMMON !used by adjectives - don't delete yet:
+Sg+Acc:uv K ;
+Sg+Gen:u K ;
+Sg+Ill:uj K ;
+Sg+Ine:un K ;
+Sg+Ela:ust K ; 
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:us K ; 
+Sg+Com:ujn K ;
+Ess:un K ;
+Pl+Nom:u K ;
+Pl+Acc:ujt K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ujd K ;
+Pl+Gen:uj K ;
+Pl+Ill:ujda K ;
+Pl+Ine:ujn K ;
+Pl+Ela:ujst K ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:ujs K ;
+Pl+Com:uj K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:ujgum K ;


LEXICON N_MONOSYL_PROPER ! monosyllabic proper nouns (mostly person names)
+N: NO_VH_X ; !add PoS, then link to morphology

!LEXICON MONOSYL_PROPER_N_S2 
LEXICON NO_VH_X  !tetra-syllabic forms such as ODD+DIM, monosyllabic proper Ns (no -i- in suffixes)
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Acc:av K ;
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
+Sg+Ine:in K ;
+Sg+Ela:ist K ; 
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:is K ; 
+Sg+Com:ijn K ;
+Ess:in K ;
+Pl+Nom:a K ;
+Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:ijd K ;
+Pl+Gen:ij K ;
+Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
+Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
+Pl+Ela:ijst K ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:ijs K ;
+Pl+Com:ij K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:ijgum K ;


!for proper names for which the inflectional paradigms are not clear (at least until more is known about how they inflect – essentially only non-Saami names)
LEXICON N_NAME_noInfl_C !C-final
+N+Sg+Nom:%> K ; 
+N: N_ODD_X ;
!diminutive for C-final names:
+N+Der/Dimin+N:a%>tj N_DIM_s2 ;


LEXICON N_NAME_noInfl_V !
+N: N_NAME_noInfl_V_s2 ;

LEXICON N_NAME_noInfl_V_s2 !V-final
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Acc:v K ;
+Sg+Gen: K ;
+Sg+Ill:j K ;
+Sg+Ine:n K ;
+Sg+Ela:st K ; 
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:s K ; 
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
+Ess:an K ;
+Pl+Nom: K ;
+Pl+Acc:jt K ;
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:jd K ;
+Pl+Gen:j K ;
+Pl+Ill:jda K ;
+Pl+Ine:jn K ;
+Pl+Ela:jst K ;
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:js K ;
+Pl+Com:j K ;
+Pl+Com+Use/NGminip:jgum K ;
!diminutive for V-final names:
+Der/Dimin+N:%>tj^V2E2AA N_DIM_s2 ;
