src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun   !!= * **@CODE@** is the main lexicon
árbålmáj:árb#ålm N_CONTR_AJA "widower" ; ! no. 64
åjjveålmáj:åjjve#ålm N_CONTR_AJA "elder, alderman" ; ! no. 4780
ålmáj:ålm N_CONTR_AJA "man, guy" ; ! no. 5222
ålmáj+Use/NG:ålbm N_CONTR_AJA "man, guy" ; ! no. 90762
bálges:bállg N_CONTR_ESAA "trail, path" ; ! no. 129
biejveldisbálges:biejveldis#bállg N_CONTR_ESAA "trail on a sun-facing slope" ; ! no. 5659
bierdnes:bierdn N_CONTR_ESAA "mid-plate on skis where shoes are placed" ; ! no. 3718
fáles:fáll N_CONTR_ESAA "whale" ; ! no. 467
giehpes:giehpp N_CONTR_ESAA "lung" ; ! no. 608
hábres:hábbr N_CONTR_ESAA "buck (male animal)" ; ! no. 3359
jalgŋes:jalgŋ N_CONTR_ESAA "upright tree stump" ; ! no. 920
muolvaksarves:muolvak#sarrv N_CONTR_ESAA "wild reindeer buck" ; ! no. 3835
njuorges:nju^Orrg N_CONTR_ESAA "cartilage" ; ! no. 1303
plásses:plás's N_CONTR_ESAA "stone slab" ; ! no. 1349
rájves:rájjv N_CONTR_ESAA "male canine" ; ! no. 1383
riebnes:riebbn N_CONTR_ESAA "opening connected to a lake" ; ! no. 90943
sarves:sarrv N_CONTR_ESAA "uncastrated reindeer buck" ; ! no. 1515
tjievres:tjievvr N_CONTR_ESAA "otter" ; ! no. 1906
vielmes:vielbm N_CONTR_ESAA "stretch of smooth water" ; ! no. 90388
viepses:viepps N_CONTR_ESAA "wasp" ; ! no. 2768
vuokses:vu^Okks N_CONTR_ESAA "cattle" ; ! no. 90308
vuontses:vu^Onnts N_CONTR_ESAA "chicken" ; ! no. 91246
hällsosentrálá:hällso#sentrálá N_NAME_noInfl_V "health center; hospital" ; ! no. 91477
